Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/en_Supplemental.aff
FLAG num
SFX 468 N 1
SFX 468 0 cokinetics .

SFX 469 N 1
SFX 469 0 collinearity .

SFX 470 N 1
SFX 470 0 cologic .

SFX 471 N 1
SFX 471 0 cologically .

SFX 472 N 1
SFX 472 0 colour .

SFX 473 N 1
SFX 473 0 coloured .

SFX 474 N 1
SFX 474 0 component .

SFX 475 N 1
SFX 475 0 composites .

SFX 476 N 1
SFX 476 0 con .

SFX 477 N 1
SFX 477 0 concelos .

SFX 478 N 1
SFX 478 0 conch .

SFX 479 N 1
SFX 479 0 cope .

SFX 480 N 1
SFX 480 0 core .

SFX 481 N 1
SFX 481 0 cortex .

SFX 482 N 1
SFX 482 0 cortical .

SFX 483 N 1
SFX 483 0 cos .

SFX 484 N 1
SFX 484 0 cose .

SFX 485 N 1
SFX 485 0 cotherapy .

SFX 486 N 1
SFX 486 0 covis .

SFX 487 N 1
SFX 487 0 cream .

SFX 488 N 1
SFX 488 0 crime .

SFX 489 N 1
SFX 489 0 crystalline .

SFX 490 N 1
SFX 490 0 crystals .

SFX 491 N 1
SFX 491 0 cs .

SFX 492 N 1
SFX 492 0 ctional .

SFX 493 N 1
SFX 493 0 ctist .

SFX 494 N 1
SFX 494 0 cu .

SFX 495 N 1
SFX 495 0 culate .

SFX 496 N 1
SFX 496 0 culated .

SFX 497 N 1
SFX 497 0 culates .

SFX 498 N 1
SFX 498 0 culating .

SFX 499 N 1
SFX 499 0 cule .

SFX 500 N 1
SFX 500 0 culent .

SFX 501 N 1
SFX 501 0 cules .

SFX 502 N 1
SFX 502 0 culture .

SFX 503 N 1
SFX 503 0 cus .

SFX 504 N 1
SFX 504 0 cy .

SFX 505 N 1
SFX 505 0 cycline .

SFX 506 N 1
SFX 506 0 cyclines .

SFX 507 N 1
SFX 507 0 cyclotron .

SFX 508 N 1
SFX 508 0 cyclotrons .

SFX 509 N 1
SFX 509 0 cyte .

SFX 510 N 1
SFX 510 0 d .

SFX 511 N 1
SFX 511 0 da .

SFX 512 N 1
SFX 512 0 dah .

SFX 513 N 1
SFX 513 0 dan .

SFX 514 N 1
SFX 514 0 danga .

SFX 515 N 1
SFX 515 0 de .

SFX 516 N 1
SFX 516 0 ded .

SFX 517 N 1
SFX 517 0 dehyde .

SFX 518 N 1
SFX 518 0 dehydes .

SFX 519 N 1
SFX 519 0 dendrology .

SFX 520 N 1
SFX 520 0 des .

SFX 521 N 1
SFX 521 0 devapura .

SFX 522 N 1
SFX 522 0 dhand .

SFX 523 N 1
SFX 523 0 dhborgarsvaedhi .

SFX 524 N 1
SFX 524 0 dhuri .

SFX 525 N 1
SFX 525 0 di .

SFX 526 N 1
SFX 526 0 dial .

SFX 527 N 1
SFX 527 0 dian .

SFX 528 N 1
SFX 528 0 dians .

SFX 529 N 1
SFX 529 0 diasis .

SFX 530 N 1
SFX 530 0 dication .

SFX 531 N 1
SFX 531 0 dications .

SFX 532 N 1
SFX 532 0 dicine .

SFX 533 N 1
SFX 533 0 dicines .

SFX 534 N 1
SFX 534 0 din .

SFX 535 N 1
SFX 535 0 ding .

SFX 536 N 1
SFX 536 0 dinian .

SFX 537 N 1
SFX 537 0 dinians .

SFX 538 N 1
SFX 538 0 dism .

SFX 539 N 1
SFX 539 0 dium .

SFX 540 N 1
SFX 540 0 diums .

SFX 541 N 1
SFX 541 0 dli .

SFX 542 N 1
SFX 542 0 dlibet .

SFX 543 N 1
SFX 543 0 dlibets .

SFX 544 N 1
SFX 544 0 do .

SFX 545 N 1
SFX 545 0 doab .

SFX 546 N 1
SFX 546 0 dol .

SFX 547 N 1
SFX 547 0 dong .

SFX 548 N 1
SFX 548 0 dot .

SFX 549 N 1
SFX 549 0 dotite .

SFX 550 N 1
SFX 550 0 dots .

SFX 551 N 1
SFX 551 0 dpur .

SFX 552 N 1
SFX 552 0 drug .

SFX 553 N 1
SFX 553 0 ds .

SFX 554 N 1
SFX 554 0 durgarh .

SFX 555 N 1
SFX 555 0 dyabati .

SFX 556 N 1
SFX 556 0 dzou .

SFX 557 N 1
SFX 557 0 e .

SFX 558 N 1
SFX 558 0 ea .

SFX 559 N 1
SFX 559 0 ean .

SFX 560 N 1
SFX 560 0 ebook .

SFX 561 N 1
SFX 561 0 ec .

SFX 562 N 1
SFX 562 0 ecant .

SFX 563 N 1
SFX 563 0 ecology .

SFX 564 N 1
SFX 564 0 ectomy .

SFX 565 N 1
SFX 565 0 ed .

SFX 566 N 1
SFX 566 0 edness .

SFX 567 N 1
SFX 567 0 een .

SFX 568 N 1
SFX 568 0 eerful .

SFX 569 N 1
SFX 569 0 eerfulness .

SFX 570 N 1
SFX 570 0 eet .

SFX 571 N 1
SFX 571 0 efacient .

SFX 572 N 1
SFX 572 0 efeld .

SFX 573 N 1
SFX 573 0 eing .

SFX 574 N 1
SFX 574 0 eisen .

SFX 575 N 1
SFX 575 0 eisens .

SFX 576 N 1
SFX 576 0 el .

SFX 577 N 1
SFX 577 0 elainize .

SFX 578 N 1
SFX 578 0 elier .

SFX 579 N 1
SFX 579 0 ellum .

SFX 580 N 1
SFX 580 0 ement .

SFX 581 N 1
SFX 581 0 emia .

SFX 582 N 1
SFX 582 0 emics .

SFX 583 N 1
SFX 583 0 en .

SFX 584 N 1
SFX 584 0 enafil .

SFX 585 N 1
SFX 585 0 enary .

SFX 586 N 1
SFX 586 0 enau .

SFX 587 N 1
SFX 587 0 encephalon .

SFX 588 N 1
SFX 588 0 encies .

SFX 589 N 1
SFX 589 0 ency .

SFX 590 N 1
SFX 590 0 ene .

SFX 591 N 1
SFX 591 0 enes .

SFX 592 N 1
SFX 592 0 enic .

SFX 593 N 1
SFX 593 0 en's .

SFX 594 N 1
SFX 594 0 ens .

SFX 595 N 1
SFX 595 0 ent .

SFX 596 N 1
SFX 596 0 entially .

SFX 597 N 1
SFX 597 0 entiary .

SFX 598 N 1
SFX 598 0 entric .

SFX 599 N 1
SFX 599 0 ents .

SFX 600 N 1
SFX 600 0 ephrine .

SFX 601 N 1
SFX 601 0 epovets .

SFX 602 N 1
SFX 602 0 eqing .

SFX 603 N 1
SFX 603 0 er .

SFX 604 N 1
SFX 604 0 erance .

SFX 605 N 1
SFX 605 0 erative .

SFX 606 N 1
SFX 606 0 eratory .

SFX 607 N 1
SFX 607 0 erball .

SFX 608 N 1
SFX 608 0 erballs .

SFX 609 N 1
SFX 609 0 erced .

SFX 610 N 1
SFX 610 0 ercentenaries .

SFX 611 N 1
SFX 611 0 ercentenary .

SFX 612 N 1
SFX 612 0 ercentennial .

SFX 613 N 1
SFX 613 0 ercress .

SFX 614 N 1
SFX 614 0 eri .

SFX 615 N 1
SFX 615 0 erick .

SFX 616 N 1
SFX 616 0 erie .

SFX 617 N 1
SFX 617 0 eries .

SFX 618 N 1
SFX 618 0 eringness .

SFX 619 N 1
SFX 619 0 eringnesses .

SFX 620 N 1
SFX 620 0 erish .

SFX 621 N 1
SFX 621 0 erlé .

SFX 622 N 1
SFX 622 0 erm .

SFX 623 N 1
SFX 623 0 erms .

SFX 624 N 1
SFX 624 0 ern .

SFX 625 N 1
SFX 625 0 ernate .

SFX 626 N 1
SFX 626 0 ernities .

SFX 627 N 1
SFX 627 0 ernity .

SFX 628 N 1
SFX 628 0 ernut .

SFX 629 N 1
SFX 629 0 ernuts .

SFX 630 N 1
SFX 630 0 erodyne .

SFX 631 N 1
SFX 631 0 erøerne .

SFX 632 N 1
SFX 632 0 erroot .

SFX 633 N 1
SFX 633 0 erroots .

SFX 634 N 1
SFX 634 0 ers .

SFX 635 N 1
SFX 635 0 erular .

SFX 636 N 1
SFX 636 0 erule .

SFX 637 N 1
SFX 637 0 eruli .

SFX 638 N 1
SFX 638 0 erulonephritides .

SFX 639 N 1
SFX 639 0 erulonephritis .

SFX 640 N 1
SFX 640 0 erulus .

SFX 641 N 1
SFX 641 0 erweed .

SFX 642 N 1
SFX 642 0 erweeds .

SFX 643 N 1
SFX 643 0 erwood .

SFX 644 N 1
SFX 644 0 erwoods .

SFX 645 N 1
SFX 645 0 ery .

SFX 646 N 1
SFX 646 0 es .

SFX 647 N 1
SFX 647 0 escein .

SFX 648 N 1
SFX 648 0 esceine .

SFX 649 N 1
SFX 649 0 esceins .

SFX 650 N 1
SFX 650 0 escent .

SFX 651 N 1
SFX 651 0 esis .

SFX 652 N 1
SFX 652 0 esquerie .

SFX 653 N 1
SFX 653 0 esqueries .

SFX 654 N 1
SFX 654 0 esquery .

SFX 655 N 1
SFX 655 0 essage .

SFX 656 N 1
SFX 656 0 essages .

SFX 657 N 1
SFX 657 0 essivity .

SFX 658 N 1
SFX 658 0 est .

SFX 659 N 1
SFX 659 0 et .

SFX 660 N 1
SFX 660 0 etau .

SFX 661 N 1
SFX 661 0 ethnic .

SFX 662 N 1
SFX 662 0 ethnography .

SFX 663 N 1
SFX 663 0 ethylene .

SFX 664 N 1
SFX 664 0 etic .

SFX 665 N 1
SFX 665 0 ets .

SFX 666 N 1
SFX 666 0 ette .

SFX 667 N 1
SFX 667 0 etted .

SFX 668 N 1
SFX 668 0 ewable .

SFX 669 N 1
SFX 669 0 ewood .

SFX 670 N 1
SFX 670 0 ewoods .

SFX 671 N 1
SFX 671 0 ey .

SFX 672 N 1
SFX 672 0 eyama .

SFX 673 N 1
SFX 673 0 eyang .

SFX 674 N 1
SFX 674 0 eyship .

SFX 675 N 1
SFX 675 0 eyships .

SFX 676 N 1
SFX 676 0 eza .

SFX 677 N 1
SFX 677 0 f .

SFX 678 N 1
SFX 678 0 fa .

SFX 679 N 1
SFX 679 0 fabrication .

SFX 680 N 1
SFX 680 0 ffirmation .

SFX 681 N 1
SFX 681 0 fibers .

SFX 682 N 1
SFX 682 0 fied .

SFX 683 N 1
SFX 683 0 fies .

SFX 684 N 1
SFX 684 0 flash .

SFX 685 N 1
SFX 685 0 flashes .

SFX 686 N 1
SFX 686 0 flexion .

SFX 687 N 1
SFX 687 0 flexions .

SFX 688 N 1
SFX 688 0 flies .

SFX 689 N 1
SFX 689 0 flora .

SFX 690 N 1
SFX 690 0 fly .

SFX 691 N 1
SFX 691 0 focal .

SFX 692 N 1
SFX 692 0 form .

SFX 693 N 1
SFX 693 0 fractals .

SFX 694 N 1
SFX 694 0 fs .

SFX 695 N 1
SFX 695 0 ful .

SFX 696 N 1
SFX 696 0 fully .

SFX 697 N 1
SFX 697 0 fulness .

SFX 698 N 1
SFX 698 0 fulnesses .

SFX 699 N 1
SFX 699 0 fy .

SFX 700 N 1
SFX 700 0 fying .

SFX 701 N 1
SFX 701 0 g .

SFX 702 N 1
SFX 702 0 ga .

SFX 703 N 1
SFX 703 0 galpa .

SFX 704 N 1
SFX 704 0 gan .

SFX 705 N 1
SFX 705 0 gang .

SFX 706 N 1
SFX 706 0 ganj .

SFX 707 N 1
SFX 707 0 garh .

SFX 708 N 1
SFX 708 0 gas .

SFX 709 N 1
SFX 709 0 gaze .

SFX 710 N 1
SFX 710 0 gdu .

SFX 711 N 1
SFX 711 0 ge .

SFX 712 N 1
SFX 712 0 ged .

SFX 713 N 1
SFX 713 0 gene .

SFX 714 N 1
SFX 714 0 generational .

SFX 715 N 1
SFX 715 0 geographies .

SFX 716 N 1
SFX 716 0 geography .

SFX 717 N 1
SFX 717 0 geology .

SFX 718 N 1
SFX 718 0 geometric .

SFX 719 N 1
SFX 719 0 ger .

SFX 720 N 1
SFX 720 0 gers .
